Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1322.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Title 20 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a chapter to read:CHAPTER 74TRAINING OF STATE FUND FIDUCIARIESSec.7401. Definitions.7402. Training requirements.7403. Content of training.7404. Legal fees.§ 7401. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this chapter shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the 1234567891011121314151617 context clearly indicates otherwise:"Commonwealth agency." A department, board, commission, agency, authority or other instrumentality of the Commonwealth."Designee." An individual appointed by, and authorized by law to act in the stead of, a trustee, board member or other appointed or elected official that stands in a fiduciary relationship to the members and beneficiaries of a State fund or a fund of a public pension system."Public pension system." The Public School Employees' Retirement System, the State Employees' Retirement System, the Pennsylvania Municipal Retirement System and any pension plan maintained by a municipality or a county for its employees."State fiduciary." A trustee, board member or other appointed or elected official, or a designee thereof, who stands in a fiduciary relationship to the members and beneficiaries of a State fund or a fund of a public pension system."State fund." A fund or account in the State Treasury or under the care, custody or control of a Commonwealth agency.§ 7402. Training requirements.(a) Training.--A State fiduciary shall complete training in fiduciary law, as provided in subsection (b).(b) Requirements.--(1) An individual who becomes a State fiduciary after the effective date of this section shall complete:(i) Two hours of training in fiduciary law within one year of becoming a State fiduciary.(ii) One hour of training in fiduciary law annually, each year thereafter.(2) An individual who is a State fiduciary on the effective date of this paragraph is exempt from the two-hour 20250HB1322PN2363 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 initial training requirement under paragraph (1)(i). The individual shall complete one hour of training in fiduciary law annually.(c) Public School Employees' Retirement Board members.--Training completed in accordance with this section by an individual who is a member of the Public School Employees' Retirement Board, or a designee of a board member, may be applied toward the individual's board training requirement under 24 Pa.C.S. § 8501(f) (relating to Public School Employees' Retirement Board) or AND Audit/Compliance Committee training requirement under 24 Pa.C.S. § 8501(g), as applicable.(d) State Employees' Retirement Board members.--Training completed under this section by an individual who is a member of the State Employees' Retirement Board, or a designee of a board member, may be applied toward the individual's board training requirement under 71 Pa.C.S. § 5901(f) (relating to the State Employees' Retirement Board) or AND Audit Risk and Compliance Committee training requirement under 71 Pa.C.S. § 5901(g), as applicable.(E) MULTIPLE SYSTEMS.--IF AN INDIVIDUAL SERVES AS A STATE FIDUCIARY TO MULTIPLE STATE FUNDS OR PENSION SYSTEMS, THE INDIVIDUAL'S TRAINING CREDITS SHALL CROSS APPLY TO ALL THE STATE FUNDS OR A FUND OF A PUBLIC PENSION SYSTEM.§ 7403. Content of training.(a) Initial training.--Initial training under section 7402(b)(1)(i) (relating to training requirements) shall, at a minimum, cover the following concepts:(1) The definition of fiduciary.(2) Conflicts of interest.(3) The prudent expert standard DUTY OF PRUDENCE . 20250HB1322PN2363 - 3 - <--<--<--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (4) Self-dealing.(b) Annual training.--Annual training under section 7402(b)(1)(ii) shall, at a minimum, cover updates and case studies related to the topics listed in subsection (a).§ 7404. Legal fees.(a) Payment permitted.--Except as provided in subsection (b), a State fiduciary is entitled to have expenses reasonably incurred by the State fiduciary in defending a threatened, pending or completed legal action against the State fiduciary in the State fiduciary's capacity as a trustee, board member or other appointed or elected official of the Commonwealth agency or public pension system paid by the Commonwealth agency or public pension system, as applicable, during the individual's tenure and, after the State fiduciary's tenure, continuing through the period of time established in any applicable statute of limitations.(b) Payment prohibited.--Payment of expenses to a State fiduciary under subsection (a) shall be prohibited if a court of competent jurisdiction finds that the conduct of the State fiduciary as alleged or proved in a legal action constituted a criminal offense, willful misconduct or self-dealing.Section 2. This act shall take effect December 31, 2025, or immediately, whichever is later.20250HB1322PN2363 - 4 - 1234567891011121314151617181920212223